Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 85. Urban Renewal

§ 3201.
Definitions.

The following terms wherever used or referred to in this chapter shall have the following meanings, unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the context:

“Agency” or “urban renewal agency” shall mean a public agency created by section 3220 of this title.

“Area of operation” shall mean the area within the corporate limits of the municipality and the area within five miles of such limits, except that it shall not include any area which lies within the territorial boundaries of another incorporated city or town unless a resolution shall have been adopted by the governing body of such other city or town declaring a need therefor.

“Blighted area” shall mean an area which, by reason of the presence of a substantial number of slum, deteriorated, or deteriorating structures; predominance of defective or inadequate street layout; faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness; insanitary or unsafe conditions; deterioration of site or other improvements; diversity of ownership; tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land; defective or unusual conditions of title; or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes; or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a municipality, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and use. If such blighted area consists of open land the conditions contained in the proviso in subsection 3207(d) of this title shall apply. Any disaster area referred to in subsection 3207(g) of this title shall constitute a “blighted area.” No area shall be determined to be a blighted area solely or primarily because its condition and value for tax purposes are less than the condition and value projected as the result of the implementation of any State, municipal, or private redevelopment plan.

“Board” or “commission” shall mean a board, commission, department, division, office, body, or other unit of the municipality.

“Bonds” shall mean any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness, debentures, or other obligations.

“Clerk” shall mean the clerk or other official of the municipality who is the custodian of the official records of such municipality.

“Federal government” shall include the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

(7a)

“Housing authority” means a housing authority established under chapter 113 of this title.

“Local governing body” shall mean the council or other legislative body charged with governing the municipality.

“Mayor” shall mean the mayor of a municipality or other officer or body having the duties customarily imposed upon the executive head of a municipality.

“Municipality” shall mean any city, village, or town in the State.

“Obligee” shall include any bondholder, agents, or trustees for any bondholders, or lessor demising to the municipality property used in connection with an urban renewal project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor’s interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the municipality.

“Person” shall mean any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic; and shall include any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other person acting in a similar representative capacity.

“Public body” shall mean the State or any municipality, township, village, board, commission, authority, district, or any other subdivision or public body of the State.

“Public officer” shall mean any officer who is in charge of any department or branch of the government of the municipality relating to health, fire, building regulations, or to other activities concerning dwellings in the municipality.

“Real property” shall include all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest, right, and use, legal or equitable therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise.

(15a)

“Related activities” means:

planning work for the preparation of a general neighborhood renewal plan, or for the preparation or completion of a community-wide plan or program under section 3208 of this title; and

the functions related to the acquisition and disposal of real property under subdivision 3209(4) of this title.

“Slum area” shall mean an area in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whether residential or nonresidential, which by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age, or obsolescence; inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces; high density of population and overcrowding; or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes; or any combination of such factors is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, or crime, and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare.

“Urban renewal area” means a slum area or a blighted area or a combination thereof which the local governing body designates as appropriate for an urban renewal project.

“Urban renewal plan” means a plan, as it exists from time to time, for an urban renewal project, which plan:

shall conform to the general plan for the municipality as a whole except as provided in subsection 3207(g) of this title and shall be consistent with definite local objectives respecting appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements;

shall be sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures and redevelopment, and such rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the urban renewal area, to indicate proposed zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, and building requirements, and to indicate in general terms the types of public improvements and proposal for redevelopment to be permitted or required; and

may include such additional materials as may from time to time be required by federal laws, regulations, and administrative requirements.

“Urban renewal project” may include undertakings and activities of a municipality in an urban renewal area for the elimination and for the prevention of the development or spread of slums and blight, and may involve slum clearance and redevelopment in an urban renewal area, or rehabilitation or conservation in an urban renewal area, or any combination or part thereof in accordance with an urban renewal plan. Such undertakings and activities may include:

acquisition of a slum area or a blighted area or portion thereof;

demolition and removal of buildings and improvements;

installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out in the urban renewal area the urban renewal objectives of this chapter in accordance with the urban renewal plan;

disposition of any property acquired in the urban renewal area, including sale, initial leasing, or retention by the municipality itself, at its fair value for uses in accordance with urban renewal plan;

acquisition of real property in the urban renewal area which, under the urban renewal plan, is to be repaired or rehabilitated for dwelling use or related facilities, repair or rehabilitation of the structures for guidance purposes, and resale of the property;

acquisition, without regard to any requirement that the area be a slum or blighted area, of air rights in an area consisting principally of land in highways, railway or subway tracks, bridge or tunnel entrances, or other similar facilities which have a blighting influence on the surrounding area and over which air rights sites are to be developed for the elimination of those blighting influences and for the provision of housing and related facilities and uses designed specifically for, and limited to, families and individuals of low or moderate income;

construction of foundations and platforms necessary for the provision of air rights sites of housing and related facilities and uses designed specifically for, and limited to, families and individuals of low or moderate income;

related activities as defined in subdivision (15a) of this section;

carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements in accordance with the urban renewal plan; and

acquisition of any other real property in the urban renewal area where necessary to eliminate unhealthful, insanitary, or unsafe conditions, lessen density, eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, or otherwise to remove or prevent the spread of blight or deterioration, or to provide land for needed public facilities.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 2

, § 4, eff. Feb. 14, 1963;

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. March 14, 1966;

2005, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 3202.
Repealed.
1963, No. 2, § 2, eff. Feb. 14, 1963.

§ 3203.
Findings and declarations of necessity.

It is hereby found and declared that there exist in municipalities of the State slum and blighted areas, as herein defined, which constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public health, safety, morals, and welfare of the residents of the State; that the existence of such areas contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime, constitutes an economic and social liability imposing onerous municipal burdens which decrease the tax base and reduce tax revenues, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of municipalities, retards the provision of housing accommodations, aggravates traffic problems and substantially impairs or arrests the elimination of traffic hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities; and that the prevention and elimination of slums and blight is a matter of State policy and State concern in order that the State and its municipalities shall not continue to be endangered by areas which are focal centers of disease, promote juvenile delinquency, and consume an excessive proportion of its revenues because of the extra services required for police, fire, accident, hospitalization, and other forms of public protection, services, and facilities.

It is further found and declared that certain slum or blighted areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance, and disposition subject to use restrictions, as provided in this chapter, since the prevailing condition of decay may make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or rehabilitation; that other areas or portions thereof may, through the means provided in this chapter, be susceptible of conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils hereinbefore enumerated may be eliminated, remedied, or prevented; and that salvable slum and blighted areas can be conserved and rehabilitated through appropriate public action as herein authorized, and the cooperation and voluntary action of the owners and tenants of property in such areas.

It is further found and declared that the powers conferred by this chapter are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be expended and the power of eminent domain and police power exercised; and that the necessity in the public interest for the provisions herein enacted is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

§ 3204.
Encouragement of private enterprise.

A municipality, to the greatest extent it determines to be feasible in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, shall afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality as a whole, to the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban renewal area by private enterprise.
A municipality shall give consideration to this objective in exercising its powers under this chapter, including the formulation of a workable program, the approval of urban renewal plans and community-wide plans or programs for urban renewal and general neighborhood renewal plans consistent with the general plan of the municipality, the exercise of its zoning powers, the enforcement of other laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, the disposition of any property acquired, and the provision of necessary public improvements.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 14, 1966.

§ 3205.
Workable program.

A municipality for the purposes of this chapter may formulate for the municipality a workable program for utilizing appropriate private and public resources to eliminate and prevent the development or spread of slums and urban blight, to encourage needed urban rehabilitation, to provide for the redevelopment of slum and blighted areas, or to undertake such of the aforesaid activities or other feasible municipal activities as may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of such workable program.
Such workable program may include provision for: the prevention of the spread of blight into areas of the municipality which are free from blight through diligent enforcement of housing, zoning, and occupancy controls and standards; the rehabilitation or conservation of slum and blighted areas or portions thereof by re-planning, removing congestion, providing parks, playgrounds, and other public improvements, by encouraging voluntary rehabilitation and by compelling the repair and rehabilitation of deteriorated or deteriorating structures; and the clearance and redevelopment of slum and blighted areas or portions thereof.

§ 3206.
Finding of necessity by local governing body.

No municipality shall exercise the authority hereafter conferred upon municipalities by this chapter until after it has voted by a majority of the voters present and voting on the question at a regular or special meeting duly warned for such purpose to adopt a resolution finding that: (1) one or more slum or blighted areas exist in such municipality; and (2) the rehabilitation, conservation, redevelopment, or a combination thereof, of such area or areas is necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, morals, or welfare of the residents of such municipality.

§ 3207.
Preparation and approval of urban renewal projects and urban renewal plans.

A municipality shall not approve an urban renewal project for an urban renewal area unless the governing body has, by resolution, determined such area to be a slum area or a blighted area or a combination thereof and designated such area as appropriate for an urban renewal project. The local governing body shall not approve an urban renewal plan until a general plan for the municipality has been prepared. A municipality shall not acquire real property for an urban renewal project unless the local governing body has approved the urban renewal project in accordance with subsection (d) of this section.

The municipality may itself prepare or cause to be prepared an urban renewal plan, or any person or agency, public or private, may submit such a plan to a municipality. Prior to its approval of an urban renewal project, the local governing body shall submit such plan to the planning commission of the municipality, if any, for review and recommendations as to its conformity with the general plan for the development of the municipality as a whole. The planning commission shall submit its written recommendations with respect to the proposed urban renewal plan to the local governing body within 30 days after receipt of the plan for review. Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission or, if no recommendations are received within said 30 days, then without such recommendations, the local governing body may proceed with the hearing on the proposed urban renewal project prescribed by subsection (c) of this section.

The local governing body shall hold a public hearing on an urban renewal project, after public notice thereof by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation of the municipality. The notice shall describe the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing, shall generally identify the urban renewal area covered by the plan, and shall outline the general scope of the urban renewal project under consideration.

Following such hearing, the local governing body may approve an urban renewal project if it finds that (1) a feasible method exists for the location of families who will be displaced from the urban renewal area in decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations within their means and without undue hardship to such families; (2) the urban renewal plan gives due consideration to the provision of adequate park and recreational areas and facilities that may be desirable for neighborhood improvement, with special consideration for the health, safety, and welfare of children residing in the general vicinity of the site covered by the plan; (3) the urban renewal plan conforms to the general plan of the municipality as a whole; and (4) the urban renewal plan will afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality as a whole, for the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban renewal area by private enterprise; provided, that if the urban renewal area consists of an area of open land to be acquired by the municipality, such area shall not be so acquired unless (A) if it is to be developed for residential uses, the local governing body shall determine that a shortage of housing of sound standards and design which is decent, safe, and sanitary exists in the municipality; that the need for housing accommodations has been or will be increased as a result of the clearance of slums in other areas, including other portions of the urban renewal area; that the conditions of blight in the area and the shortage of decent, safe, and sanitary housing cause or contribute to an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare; and the acquisition of the area for residential uses is an integral part of an essential to the program of the municipality; or (B) if it is to be developed for nonresidential uses, the local governing body shall determine that such nonresidential uses are necessary and appropriate to facilitate the proper growth and development of the community in accordance with sound planning standards and local community objectives, with acquisition may require the exercise of governmental action, as provided in this chapter, because of defective or unusual conditions of title, diversity of ownership, tax delinquency, improper subdivisions, outmoded street patterns, deterioration of site, economic disuse, unsuitable topography or faulty lot layouts, the need for the correlation of the area with other areas of a municipality by streets and modern traffic requirements, or any combination of such favors or other conditions which retard development of the area.

An urban renewal plan may be modified at any time; provided, that if modified after the lease or sale by the municipality of real property in the urban renewal project area, such modification may be conditioned upon such approval of the owner, lessee, or successor in interest as the municipality may deem advisable and in any event shall be subject to such rights at law or in equity as a lessee or purchaser, or his successor or successors in interest, may be entitled to assert.

Upon the approval by a municipality by a vote of a majority of the voters present and voting on the question at a regular or special meeting duly warned for that purpose of an urban renewal plan or of any modification thereof, such plan or modification shall be deemed to be in full force and effect for the respective urban renewal area and the municipality may then cause such plan or modification to be carried out in accordance with its terms.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, where the local governing body certifies that an area is in need of redevelopment or rehabilitation as a result of a flood, fire, hurricane, earthquake, storm, or other catastrophe respecting which the government of the State has certified the need for disaster assistance under Public Law 875, eighty-first Congress, or other federal law, the local governing body may approve an urban renewal plan and an urban renewal project with respect to such area without regard to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section and the provisions of this section requiring a general plan for the municipality and a public hearing on the urban renewal project.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 14, 1966.

§ 3208.
Neighborhood and community-wide plans.

A municipality or a planning commission may prepare a general neighborhood renewal plan for an urban renewal area, together with any adjoining areas having specially related problems, which may be of such scope that urban renewal activities may have to be carried out in stages. The plan may include a preliminary plan which:

outlines the urban renewal activities, proposed for the areas involved;

provides a framework for the preparation of urban renewal plans; and

indicates generally the land uses, population density, building coverage, prospective requirements for rehabilitation, and improvement of property and portions of the area contemplated for clearance and redevelopment.

A general neighborhood renewal plan shall, in the determination of the local governing body, conform to the general plan of the locality as a whole and the workable program of the municipality.

A municipality or planning commission may prepare or complete a community-wide plan or program for urban renewal which shall conform to the general plan for the development of the municipality as a whole and may include identification of slum or blighted areas, measurement of blight, determination of resources needed and available to renew those areas, identification of potential project areas and types of action contemplated, and scheduling of urban renewal activities.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.), § 5, eff. March 14, 1966.

§ 3209.
Powers.

Every municipality shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted:

to undertake and carry out urban renewal projects within its area of operation; and to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this chapter; and to disseminate slum clearance and urban renewal information;

to provide or to arrange or contract for the furnishing or repair by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities, or other facilities for or in connection with an urban renewal project; to install, construct, and reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other public improvements; and to agree to any conditions that it may deem reasonable and appropriate attached to federal financial assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor standards, in the undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project, and to include in any contract let in connection with such a project, provisions to fulfill such of said conditions as it may deem reasonable and appropriate;

within its area of operation, to enter into any building or property in any urban renewal area in order to make inspections, surveys, appraisals, soundings, or test borings, and to obtain an order for this purpose from a court of competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted; to acquire by purchase, lease, option, gift, grant, bequest, devise, eminent domain, or otherwise, any real property, or personal property for its administrative purposes, together with any improvements thereon; to hold, improve, clear, or prepare for redevelopment any such property; to mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber or dispose of any real property; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the municipality against any risks or hazards, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance; and to enter into any contracts necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter; provided, however, that no statutory provision with respect to the acquisition, clearance, or disposition of property by public bodies shall restrict a municipality or other public body exercising powers hereunder, in the exercise of such functions with respect to an urban renewal project, unless the Legislature shall specifically so state;

with the approval of the local governing body, (A) before approval of an urban renewal plan, or approval of any modifications of the plan, to acquire real property in an urban renewal area, demolish and remove any structures on the property, and pay all costs related to the acquisition, demolition, or removal, including any administrative or relocation expenses; and (B) to assume the responsibility to bear any loss that may arise as the result of the exercise of authority under this subsection if the real property is not made part of the urban renewal project;

to invest any urban renewal project funds held in reserve or sinking funds or any such funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to redeem such bonds as have been issued pursuant to section 3214 of this title at the redemption price established therein or to purchase such bonds at less than redemption price, all such bonds so redeemed or purchased to be cancelled;

to borrow money and to apply for and accept advances, loans, grants, contributions, and any other form of financial assistance from the federal government, the State, county, or other public body, or from any sources, public or private, for the purposes of this chapter, and to give such security as may be required and to enter into and carry out contracts in connection therewith. A municipality may include in any contract for financial assistance with the federal government for an urban renewal project such conditions imposed pursuant to federal laws as the municipality may deem reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter;

within its area of operation, to make or have made all surveys and plans necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter and to contract with any person, public or private, in making and carrying out such plans and to adopt or approve, modify, and amend such plans. Such plans may include: (A) a general plan for the locality as a whole, (B) urban renewal plans, (C) preliminary plans outlining urban renewal activities for neighborhoods to embrace two or more urban renewal areas, (D) plans for carrying out a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements, (E) plans for the enforcement of State and local laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements, (F) appraisals, title searches, surveys, studies, and other plans and work necessary to prepare for the undertaking of urban renewal projects and to develop, test, and report methods and techniques, and carry out demonstrations and other activities, for the prevention and the elimination of slums and urban blight and developing and demonstrating new or improved means of providing housing for families and persons of low income and to apply for, accept, and utilize grants of funds from the federal government for such purposes;

to prepare plans for and assist in the relocation of persons, including individuals, families, business concerns, nonprofit organizations, and others, displaced from an urban renewal area, and to make relocation payments to or with respect to such persons for moving expenses and losses of property, including the making of such payments financed by the federal government;

to appropriate such funds and make such expenditures as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and to levy taxes and assessments for such purposes; to zone or rezone any part of the municipality or make exceptions from building regulations; and to enter into agreements with a housing authority or an urban renewal agency vested with urban renewal project powers under section 3219 of this title, which agreements may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary, respecting action to be taken by such municipality pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter;

to close, vacate, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places; and to plan or replan any part of the municipality;

within its area of operation, to organize, coordinate, and direct the administration of the provisions of this chapter as they apply to such municipality in order that the objective of remedying slum and blighted areas and preventing the causes thereof within such municipality may be most effectively promoted and achieved, and to establish such new office or offices of the municipality or to reorganize existing offices in order to carry out such purpose most effectively; and

to exercise all or any part or combination of powers herein granted.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.), § 6, eff. March 14, 1966.

§ 3210.
Eminent domain; authority; survey.

A municipality shall have the right to acquire by condemnation a fee simple title or any other interest in real property which it may determine necessary for or in connection with an urban renewal project under this chapter. The powers conferred upon municipalities under this section shall be considered “urban renewal project powers” as defined in subsection 3219(b) of this title and the term “municipality,”, as used in this section, shall mean the agency, board, commissioner or officers having such powers under subsection 3219(a) of this title. The municipality shall set out the necessary lands and cause them to be surveyed. An urban renewal plan approved under subsection 3207(d) of this title may be considered to constitute such a survey.

Unless two-thirds of the voters present and voting thereon at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose vote otherwise, nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the taking, by condemnation proceedings, of property of any religious, charitable, or educational society, institution, or organization, unless held or used by it for commercial purposes, without the written consent of the trustees or the governing body of such society, institution, or organization. Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired hereunder but no real property belonging to the State or any political subdivision thereof shall be acquired without its consent.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 2

, § 3, eff. Feb. 14, 1963;

1964, No. 9

(Sp. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 5, 1964.

§ 3211.
Determination of necessity.

After completion of such survey, the municipality shall petition a Superior Court judge, setting forth therein that it proposes to take certain land or rights therein and describing such lands or rights, and the survey shall be annexed to the petition and made a part thereof. The petition shall set forth the purposes for which the land or rights are desired, and shall contain a request that the judge fix a time and place when the judge, or some other Superior Court judge, will hear all parties concerned and determine whether such taking is necessary.

The Superior Court judge to whom the petition is presented shall fix the time for hearing, which shall not be more than 60 nor less than 40 days from the date the judge signs such order. Likewise, the judge shall fix the place for hearing, which shall be the county courthouse or any other place within the county in which the land in question is located. If the Superior Court judge to whom the petition is presented cannot hear the petition at the time set therefor, the judge shall call upon the administrative judge to assign another Superior Court judge to hear the cause at the time and place assigned in the order.

Notice of hearing on the petition, which shall include the name of the city, town, or village in which the lands to be taken or affected are located, the names of the persons having an interest in the lands, a brief statement identifying the urban renewal projects contemplated including its location, and the date, time, and place of hearing shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the city, town, or village in which the lands lie, once a week for three consecutive weeks on the same day of the week, the last publication to be not less than five days before the hearing date, and a complete copy of the original petition, together with a copy of the court’s order fixing the time and place of hearing, and a copy of the survey shall be placed on file in the clerk’s office of the city, town, or village in which the land included in the survey lies. A copy of the petition, together with the court’s order fixing the time and place of hearing, shall be served upon each person owning or having an interest in land to be purchased or condemned like a summons by an officer authorized to make service of process under Vermont statutes and residing in the county in which the petition is to be served, or, on absent defendants in such manner as the Supreme Court may by rule provide for service of process in civil actions. If the service on any defendant is impossible, upon affidavit of the sheriff, deputy sheriff, or constable attempting service, stating that the location of the defendant within or without the State is unknown and that he or she has no known agent or attorney in the State of Vermont upon which service may be made, and upon affidavit of an officer of the municipality that diligent inquiry has been made to find the location of the defendant, the publication herein provided shall be considered sufficient service on the defendant. Petitions shall be returnable to the court on the tenth day next preceding the date set for hearing thereon. Compliance with the provisions hereof shall constitute sufficient service upon and notice to any persons owning or having any interest in the land proposed to be taken or affected.

At the time and place appointed for the hearing, the court consisting of the Superior Court judge signing the order or such other Superior Court judge as may be assigned and the two assistant judges of the county in which the hearing is held shall hear all persons interested and wishing to be heard. If any person owning or having an interest in the land to be taken or affected appears and objects to the necessity of taking the land included within the survey or any part thereof, then the court shall require the municipality to proceed with the introduction of evidence of the necessity of such taking. The court may cite in additional parties in its discretion, shall make findings of fact, and shall file the same. The court shall, by its order, determine whether the taking of such land and rights is necessary and may modify the proposed taking in such respects as the court may consider proper.

An appeal may be taken to the Supreme Court by any party aggrieved in such manner as the Supreme Court may by rule provide for appeals from Superior Courts. If an appeal is taken, all proceedings shall be stayed until final disposition of the appeal. If no appeal is taken within the time provided for or, if appeal is taken, upon final disposition thereof, a copy of the order of the court shall be placed on file in the office of the clerk of the city, town, or village where the urban renewal project is located and within a period of two years from the final order the municipality may institute proceedings for the condemnation of the land included in the survey as finally approved by the court without further hearing or consideration of the question of the necessity of such taking.

In considering the issue of necessity, the Superior Court and assistant judges shall, to the extent constitutionally permitted, give effect to the legislative determinations made in this chapter and to the determinations made by the voters and appropriate municipal authorities under this chapter. The court shall not give weight to a projected increase in economic value of the subject property solely or primarily because its condition and value for tax purposes are less than the condition and value projected as the result of the implementation of any State, municipal, or private redevelopment plan.

HISTORY:

Added

1964, No. 9

(Sp. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 5, 1964; amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 201, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2005, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.